New York, session 2025-2026, S6686.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraph (a) of subdivision 3 of section 2984 of the 2 public health law, as amended by chapter 8 of the laws of 2010, is 3 amended to read as follows: 4 (a) the hospital has informed the patient or the health care agent of 5 such policy prior to [or upon] admission, [if reasonably possible] 6 provided, that in the case of an emergency, the information may be 7 provided as soon as reasonably possible upon or after admission, and if 8 such information is given upon admission or later, an explanation as to 9 why such information was not given prior to admission shall be given to 10 the patient or health care agent and shall be placed in the patient's 11 medical record; and 12 § 2. Paragraph (b) of subdivision 1 of section 2994-n of the public 13 health law, as added by chapter 8 of the laws of 2010, is amended to 14 read as follows: 15 (b) The hospital has informed the patient, family, or surrogate of 16 such policy prior to [or upon] admission, [if reasonably possible] 17 provided, that in the case of an emergency, the information may be 18 provided as soon as reasonably possible upon or after admission, and if 19 such information is given upon admission or later, an explanation as to 20 why such information was not given prior to admission shall be given to 21 the patient or health care agent and shall be placed in the patient's 22 medical record; and 23 § 3. This act shall take effect on the sixtieth day after it shall 24 have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD01254-01-5